Florida, session 2026, SB1054.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSubsection (5) of section 318.14, Florida 24 Statutes, is amended to read: 25 318.14âNoncriminal traffic infractions; exception; 26 procedures.â 27 (5)âA Any person who elects electing to appear before the 28 designated official or who is required to appear is shall be 29 deemed to have waived his or her right to the civil penalty 30 provisions of s. 318.18. The official, after a hearing, shall 31 make a determination as to whether an infraction has been 32 committed. If the commission of an infraction has been proven, 33 the official may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $500, 34 except that in cases involving unlawful speed in a school zone 35 or involving unlawful speed in a construction zone, the civil 36 penalty may not exceed $1,000; or require attendance at a driver 37 improvement school, or both. If the person is required to appear 38 before the designated official pursuant to s. 318.19(1) and is 39 found to have committed the infraction, the designated official 40 must shall impose a civil penalty of $1,000 in addition to any 41 other penalties and the personâs driver license must shall be 42 suspended for 6 months. If the person is required to appear 43 before the designated official pursuant to s. 318.19(1) and is 44 found to have committed the infraction against a vulnerable road 45 user as defined in s. 316.027(1), the designated official must 46 shall impose a civil penalty of not less than $5,000 in addition 47 to any other penalties, the personâs driver license must shall 48 be suspended for 1 year, and the person must shall be required 49 to attend a department-approved driver improvement course 50 relating to the rights of vulnerable road users relative to 51 vehicles on the roadway as provided in s. 322.0261(2). If the 52 person is required to appear before the designated official 53 pursuant to s. 318.19(2) and is found to have committed the 54 infraction, the designated official must shall impose a civil 55 penalty of $500 in addition to any other penalties and the 56 personâs driver license must shall be suspended for 3 months. If 57 the person is required to appear before the designated official 58 pursuant to s. 318.19(2) and is found to have committed the 59 infraction against a vulnerable road user as defined in s. 60 316.027(1), the designated official must shall impose a civil 61 penalty of not less than $1,500 in addition to any other 62 penalties, the personâs driver license must shall be suspended 63 for 3 months, and the person must shall be required to attend a 64 department-approved driver improvement course relating to the 65 rights of vulnerable road users relative to vehicles on the 66 roadway as provided in s. 322.0261(2). If the person is required 67 to appear before the designated official pursuant to s. 68 318.19(7) and is found to have committed an infraction of s. 69 316.074(1) or s. 316.123(2) which resulted in a crash with 70 another vehicle as defined in s. 316.003, the designated 71 official must impose a civil penalty of $500 in addition to any 72 other penalties. If the person is required to appear before the 73 designated official pursuant to s. 318.19(7) for an infraction 74 and is found to have committed a second infraction of s. 75 316.074(1) or s. 316.123(2) which resulted in a crash with 76 another vehicle as defined in s. 316.003, the designated 77 official must impose a civil penalty of $1,000 in addition to 78 any other penalties and the personâs driver license must be 79 suspended for 6 months. If the person is required to appear 80 before the designated official pursuant to s. 318.19(7) for an 81 infraction and is found to have committed a third or subsequent 82 infraction of s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.123(2) which resulted in a 83 crash with another vehicle as defined in s. 316.003, the 84 designated official must impose a civil penalty of $1,000 in 85 addition to any other penalties and the personâs driver license 86 must be suspended for 1 year. If the official determines that no 87 infraction has been committed, no costs or penalties may shall 88 be imposed and any costs or penalties that have been paid must 89 shall be returned. Moneys received from the mandatory civil 90 penalties imposed pursuant to this subsection upon persons 91 required to appear before a designated official pursuant to s. 92 318.19(1) or (2) shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue 93 and deposited into the Department of Health Emergency Medical 94 Services Trust Fund to provide financial support to certified 95 trauma centers to assure the availability and accessibility of 96 trauma services throughout the state. Funds deposited into the 97 Emergency Medical Services Trust Fund under this section shall 98 be allocated as follows: 99 (a)âFifty percent shall be allocated equally among all 100 Level I, Level II, and pediatric trauma centers in recognition 101 of readiness costs for maintaining trauma services. 102 (b)âFifty percent shall be allocated among Level I, Level 103 II, and pediatric trauma centers based on each centerâs relative 104 volume of trauma cases as calculated using the hospital 105 discharge data collected pursuant to s. 408.061. 106 Section 2.âSection 318.19, Florida Statutes, is amended to 107 read: 108 318.19âInfractions requiring a mandatory hearing.âAny 109 person cited for the infractions listed in this section does 110 shall not have the provisions of s. 318.14(2), (4), and (9) 111 available to him or her but must appear before the designated 112 official at the time and location of the scheduled hearing: 113 (1)âAny infraction which results in a crash that causes the 114 death of another; 115 (2)âAny infraction which results in a crash that causes 116 âserious bodily injuryâ of another as defined in s. 316.1933(1); 117 (3)âAny infraction of s. 316.172(1)(b); 118 (4)âAny infraction of s. 316.520(1) or (2); 119 (5)âAny infraction of s. 316.183(2), s. 316.187, or s. 120 316.189 of exceeding the speed limit by 30 mph or more; or 121 (6)âAny infraction of s. 316.1926(2); or 122 (7)âAny infraction of s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.123(2) which 123 results in a crash with another vehicle as defined in s. 124 316.003. 125 Section 3.âSection 324.023, Florida Statutes, is amended to 126 read: 127 324.023âFinancial responsibility for bodily injury or 128 death.â 129 (1)âIn addition to any other financial responsibility 130 required by law, every owner or operator of a motor vehicle that 131 is required to be registered in this state, or that is located 132 within this state, and who:, 133 (a)âRegardless of adjudication of guilt, has been found 134 guilty of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a 135 charge of driving under the influence under s. 316.193 after 136 October 1, 2007; or 137 (b)âIs found to have committed an infraction of s. 138 316.075(1)(c) or s. 316.123(2) which resulted in a crash with 139 another vehicle as defined in s. 316.003, 140 141 shall, by one of the methods established in s. 324.031(1) or 142 (2), establish and maintain the ability to respond in damages 143 for liability on account of accidents arising out of the use of 144 a motor vehicle in the amount of $100,000 because of bodily 145 injury to, or death of, one person in any one crash and, subject 146 to such limits for one person, in the amount of $300,000 because 147 of bodily injury to, or death of, two or more persons in any one 148 crash and in the amount of $50,000 because of property damage in 149 any one crash. If the owner or operator chooses to establish and 150 maintain such ability by furnishing a certificate of deposit 151 pursuant to s. 324.031(2), such certificate of deposit must be 152 at least $350,000. An owner or operator described in paragraph 153 (a) must carry such higher limits must be carried for at least a 154 minimum period of 3 years. An owner or operator described in 155 paragraph (b) must carry such higher limits for at least 1 year. 156 (2)âIf an the owner or operator described in paragraph 157 (1)(a) has not been convicted of driving under the influence or 158 a felony traffic offense for at least a period of 3 years after 159 from the date of reinstatement of driving privileges for a 160 violation of s. 316.193, the owner or operator is shall be 161 exempt from this section. 162 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.